incubator/apertium-pes/dev/apertium-tg-fa.fa.dix
<pardef n="/VERBS__گذاشت">
                        <e><par n="P__prefixes"/><p><l>گذاشت</l><r>گذاشتن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="V__چشید/ن__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__prefixes"/><p><l>گذاشته</l><r>گذاشتن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><j/></r></p><par n="zwnj_or_space"/><par n="aV__/استن__vbser"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__imp__prefixes"/><p><l>گذاران</l><r>گذاشتن<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
                        <e><par n="P__imp__prefixes"/><p><l>گذار</l><r>گذاشتن<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p><par n="V__/بچش[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__njprefixes"/><p><l>گذار</l><r>گذاشتن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/></r></p><par n="V__چش/[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__jprefixes"/><p><l>گذار</l><r>گذاشتن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="V__چش/[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>

</pardef>
<pardef n="/VERBS__گذازاند">
                        <e><par n="P__prefixes"/><p><l>گذازاند</l><r>گذازاندن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="V__چشید/ن__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__prefixes"/><p><l>گذازانده</l><r>گذازاندن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><j/></r></p><par n="zwnj_or_space"/><par n="aV__/استن__vbser"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__imp__prefixes"/><p><l>گدازانان</l><r>گذازاندن<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
                        <e><par n="P__imp__prefixes"/><p><l>گدازان</l><r>گذازاندن<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p><par n="V__/بچش[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__njprefixes"/><p><l>گدازان</l><r>گذازاندن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/></r></p><par n="V__چش/[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__jprefixes"/><p><l>گدازان</l><r>گذازاندن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="V__چش/[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>

</pardef>
<pardef n="/VERBS__گدازانید">
                        <e><par n="P__prefixes"/><p><l>گدازانید</l><r>گدازانیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="V__چشید/ن__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__prefixes"/><p><l>گدازانیده</l><r>گدازانیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><j/></r></p><par n="zwnj_or_space"/><par n="aV__/استن__vbser"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__imp__prefixes"/><p><l>گدازانان</l><r>گدازانیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
                        <e><par n="P__imp__prefixes"/><p><l>گدازان</l><r>گدازانیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p><par n="V__/بچش[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__njprefixes"/><p><l>گدازان</l><r>گدازانیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/></r></p><par n="V__چش/[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__jprefixes"/><p><l>گدازان</l><r>گدازانیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="V__چش/[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>

</pardef>
<pardef n="/VERBS__گداخت">
                        <e><par n="P__prefixes"/><p><l>گداخت</l><r>گداختن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="V__چشید/ن__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__prefixes"/><p><l>گداخته</l><r>گداختن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><j/></r></p><par n="zwnj_or_space"/><par n="aV__/استن__vbser"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__imp__prefixes"/><p><l>گدازان</l><r>گداختن<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
                        <e><par n="P__imp__prefixes"/><p><l>گداز</l><r>گداختن<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p><par n="V__/بچش[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__njprefixes"/><p><l>گداز</l><r>گداختن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/></r></p><par n="V__چش/[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__jprefixes"/><p><l>گداز</l><r>گداختن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="V__چش/[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>

</pardef>
<pardef n="/VERBS__کوفت">
                        <e><par n="P__prefixes"/><p><l>کوفت</l><r>کوفتن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="V__چشید/ن__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__prefixes"/><p><l>کوفته</l><r>کوفتن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><j/></r></p><par n="zwnj_or_space"/><par n="aV__/استن__vbser"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__imp__prefixes"/><p><l>کوبان</l><r>کوفتن<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
                        <e><par n="P__imp__prefixes"/><p><l>کوب</l><r>کوفتن<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p><par n="V__/بچش[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__njprefixes"/><p><l>کوب</l><r>کوفتن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/></r></p><par n="V__چش/[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__jprefixes"/><p><l>کوب</l><r>کوفتن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="V__چش/[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>

</pardef>
<pardef n="/VERBS__کوبید">
                        <e><par n="P__prefixes"/><p><l>کوبید</l><r>کوبیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="V__چشید/ن__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__prefixes"/><p><l>کوبیده</l><r>کوبیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><j/></r></p><par n="zwnj_or_space"/><par n="aV__/استن__vbser"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__imp__prefixes"/><p><l>کوبان</l><r>کوبیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
                        <e><par n="P__imp__prefixes"/><p><l>کوب</l><r>کوبیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p><par n="V__/بچش[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__njprefixes"/><p><l>کوب</l><r>کوبیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/></r></p><par n="V__چش/[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__jprefixes"/><p><l>کوب</l><r>کوبیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="V__چش/[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>

</pardef>
<pardef n="/VERBS__کوبانید">
                        <e><par n="P__prefixes"/><p><l>کوبانید</l><r>کوبانیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="V__چشید/ن__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__prefixes"/><p><l>کوبانیده</l><r>کوبانیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><j/></r></p><par n="zwnj_or_space"/><par n="aV__/استن__vbser"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__imp__prefixes"/><p><l>کوبانان</l><r>کوبانیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
                        <e><par n="P__imp__prefixes"/><p><l>کوبان</l><r>کوبانیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p><par n="V__/بچش[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__njprefixes"/><p><l>کوبان</l><r>کوبانیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/></r></p><par n="V__چش/[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__jprefixes"/><p><l>کوبان</l><r>کوبانیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="V__چش/[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>

</pardef>
<pardef n="/VERBS__کوباند">
                        <e><par n="P__prefixes"/><p><l>کوباند</l><r>کوباندن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="V__چشید/ن__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__prefixes"/><p><l>کوبانده</l><r>کوباندن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><j/></r></p><par n="zwnj_or_space"/><par n="aV__/استن__vbser"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__imp__prefixes"/><p><l>کوبانان</l><r>کوباندن<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
                        <e><par n="P__imp__prefixes"/><p><l>کوبان</l><r>کوباندن<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p><par n="V__/بچش[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__njprefixes"/><p><l>کوبان</l><r>کوباندن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/></r></p><par n="V__چش/[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__jprefixes"/><p><l>کوبان</l><r>کوباندن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="V__چش/[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>

</pardef>

                            <e lm="کوبانیدن"><i/><par n="/VERBS__کوبانید"/></e>
                            <e lm="کوباندن"><i/><par n="/VERBS__کوباند"/></e>
                            <e lm="کوبیدن"><i/><par n="/VERBS__کوبید"/></e>
                            <e lm="کوفتن"><i/><par n="/VERBS__کوفت"/></e>
                            <e lm="گداختن"><i/><par n="/VERBS__گداخت"/></e>
                            <e lm="گدازانیدن"><i/><par n="/VERBS__گدازانید"/></e>
                            <e lm="گذازاندن"><i/><par n="/VERBS__گذازاند"/></e>
                            <e lm="گذاشتن"><i/><par n="/VERBS__گذاشت"/></e>
